Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 2. Coverage of Personnel.

Sec. 39.25.090.
Coverage of chapter.

This chapter and the rules adopted under it apply to all positions in

the classified service; and

the exempt and partially exempt service as specifically provided.

History.

(§ 3 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 112 SLA 1982)

Sec. 39.25.100.
Classified service.

The classified service consists of all positions in the state service not included in the exempt service or in the partially exempt service.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1960)

Sec. 39.25.110.
Exempt service.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the following positions in the state service constitute the exempt service and are exempt from the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under it:

persons elected to public office by popular vote or appointed to fill vacancies in elected offices;

justices, judges, magistrates, and employees of the judicial branch including employees of the judicial council;

employees of the state legislature and its agencies;

the head of each principal department in the executive branch;

officers and employees of the University of Alaska;

certificated teachers and noncertificated employees employed by a regional educational attendance area established and organized under AS

14.08.031

—

14.08.041

to teach in, administer, or operate schools under the control of a regional educational attendance area school board;

certificated teachers employed by the Department of Education and Early Development as correspondence teachers, teachers in skill centers operated by the Department of Education and Early Development or by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, or in Mt. Edgecumbe School;

patients and inmates employed in state institutions;

persons employed in a professional capacity to make a temporary or special inquiry, study or examination as authorized by the governor;

members of boards, commissions, or authorities;

the officers and employees of the following boards, commissions, and authorities:

[Repealed, § 13 ch 43 SLA 1994.]

Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation;

Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority;

Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission;

Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education;

Alaska Aerospace Corporation;

[Repealed, § 23 ch 11 SLA 2013.]

Alaska Gasline Development Corporation and subsidiaries of the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation;

the executive secretary and legal counsel of the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority;

the state medical examiner, deputy medical examiner, and assistant medical examiners appointed under AS

12.65.015

and pharmacists and physicians licensed to practice in this state and employed by the Department of Health and Social Services or by the Department of Corrections;

petroleum engineers and petroleum geologists employed in a professional capacity by the Department of Natural Resources and by the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission;

[Repealed, § 1 ch 32 SLA 1999.]

persons employed by the division of marine transportation as masters and members of the crews of vessels who operate the state ferry system and who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement provided in AS

23.40.040

;

officers and employees of the state who reside in foreign countries;

employees of the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute;

emergency firefighting personnel employed by the Department of Natural Resources for a fire emergency or for fire prevention and related activities conducted under AS

41.15.030

;

employees of the Office of the Governor and the office of the lieutenant governor, including the staff of the governor’s mansion;

[Repealed, § 47 ch 99 SLA 2004.]

youth employed by the Department of Natural Resources under the Youth Employment and Student Intern programs;

[Repealed, § 6 ch 28 SLA 2003.]

students employed by the state institutions in which the students are enrolled;

[Repealed, § 8 ch 2 SLA 2004.]

investment officers in the Department of Revenue;

[Repealed, § 10 ch 29 SLA 1999.]

persons engaged in employment or pre-employment training programs operated by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs;

[Repealed, § 9 ch 115 SLA 1989.]

a person employed as an actuary or assistant actuary by the division of insurance in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

[Repealed, § 91 ch 163 SLA 2004.]

a participant in the Alaska temporary assistance program under AS 47.27 who holds a temporary position with the state in order to obtain job training or experience;

a person employed as a convener under AS

44.62.730

or as a facilitator under AS

44.62.760

related to a negotiated regulation making process under AS

44.62.710

—

44.62.800

;

the chief executive officer and employees of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority employed under AS

47.30.026(b)

;

the assistant adjutant general for space and missile defense appointed under AS

26.05.185

;

the victims’ advocate established under AS

24.65.010

and the advocate’s staff;

employees of the Alaska mental health trust land unit established under AS

44.37.050

;

the executive director of the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault established under AS

18.66.010

;

the executive director and employees of the Knik Arm Bridge and Toll Authority under AS

19.75.051

and

19.75.061

;

the chair of the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Commission (AS

23.30.007

);

the Alaska Gasline Inducement Act coordinator appointed under AS

43.90.250

;

oil and gas audit masters employed in a professional capacity by the Department of Revenue and the Department of Natural Resources to collect oil and gas revenue by developing policy, conducting studies, drafting proposed regulations, enforcing regulations, and directing audits by oil and gas revenue auditors;

the in-state gasline project coordinator appointed under AS

38.34.010

;

the executive director and employees of the Alaska State Council on the Arts employed under AS

44.27.054

and

44.27.055

;

utilities analyst masters employed in a professional capacity by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska under AS

42.04.050(a)

.

History.

(am E.O. No. 72 § 2 (1989); § 5 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 133 SLA 1961; am § 3 ch 93 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 31 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 65 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 13 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 1971; am § 18 ch 78 SLA 1974; am § 42 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 37 ch 124 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 157 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 90 SLA 1978; am § 7 ch 18 SLA 1980; am § 43 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 148 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 106 SLA 1981; am §§ 2, 3 ch 37 SLA 1982; am § 7 ch 112 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 1984; am § 58 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1985; am § 69 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 78 SLA 1988; am § 26 ch 141 SLA 1988; am § 11 ch 95 SLA 1989; am §§ 7, 9 ch 115 SLA 1989; am § 10 ch 88 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 47 SLA 1993; am § 13 ch 43 SLA 1994; am § 111 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 17 ch 103 SLA 1996; am § 25 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 121 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 117 SLA 1998; am § 10 ch 29 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 30 SLA 2001; am § 20 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 3 2002 Ballot Measure No. 3; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 91 SLA 2002; am § 6 ch 28 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 49 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 77 SLA 2003; am § 8 ch 2 SLA 2004; am § 91 ch 163 SLA 2004; am § 69 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 2006; am § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 4 ch 22 SLA 2007; am § 50 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 5 ch 47 SLA 2009; am § 6 ch 7 SLA 2010; am §§ 14, 23 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 9 ch 47 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2017; am § 2 ch 24 SLA 2019)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former paragraph (29) was enacted as (28). Renumbered in 1989. Paragraph (32) was enacted as (31); renumbered in 1996. Paragraphs (35) and (36) were enacted as (34); renumbered in 2001.

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in paragraph (30) in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in paragraph (7) in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Paragraph (38) was enacted as paragraph (37) and renumbered in 2002.

In 2003, in paragraph (39), “AS

19.75.051

and

19.75.061

” was substituted for “AS 44.90.051 and 44.90.061” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 44.90.051 and 44.90.061.

In 2004, in paragraph (30) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

In 2009, under § 2, ch. 60, SLA 2009, in paragraph (11) of this section “Alaska Aerospace Corporation” was substituted for “Alaska Aerospace Development Corporation”.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent regarding the oil and gas revenue audit master positions authorized by paragraph (42) of this section, see § 69, ch. 1, SSSLA 2007.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective April 27, 2010, added paragraph (43).

The first 2013 amendment, effective May 22, 2013, repealed (11)(G); added (11)(H).

The second 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (14), deleted “, except for those employed in the division of geological and geophysical surveys in the department of natural resources” at the end.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, added (44).

The 2019 amendment, effective November 27, 2019, added (45).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 7, ch. 117, SLA 1998, which was to repeal paragraph (33) of this section effective July 1, 2003, was repealed by § 2, ch. 44, SLA 2003.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 1, SSSLA 2007 (HB 2001), presenting, among other matter, a proposal relating to classification of petroleum revenue auditors under the State Personnel Act, see 2007 House Journal 1547 — 1550.

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the 2013 changes to this section made in
ch. 47, SLA 2013 (SB 95), see 2013 Senate Journal 888 — 890.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Staff administering the Alaska Military Youth Academy are members of the classified service, and are not in the exempt service, because they are not “persons engaged” in the employment training program, as required by subsection (28). Oct. 13, 2000, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.25.120.
Partially exempt service.

Positions in the partially exempt service are included in the position classification plan established under this chapter and are compensated according to the pay plan under AS

39.27.011

.

A person holding a position in the partially exempt service is not required to complete an assessment and is not eligible for a hearing by the personnel board in case of dismissal, demotion, or suspension. Positions in the partially exempt service are specifically exempt from the rules established under AS

39.25.150

(3) — (10), (12), (13), and (16).

The following positions in the state service constitute the partially exempt service:

deputy and assistant commissioners of the principal departments of the executive branch, including the assistant adjutant general of the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs;

the directors of the major divisions of the principal departments of the executive branch and the regional directors of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities;

attorney members of the staff of the Department of Law, of the public defender agency, and of the office of public advocacy in the Department of Administration;

one private secretary for each head of a principal department in the executive branch;

employees of councils, boards, or commissions established by statute in the Office of the Governor or the office of the lieutenant governor, unless a different classification is provided by statute;

not more than two special assistants to the commissioner of each of the principal departments of the executive branch, but the number may be increased if the partially exempt service is extended under AS

39.25.130

to include the additional special assistants;

the principal executive officer of the following boards, councils, or commissions:

Alaska Public Broadcasting Commission;

Professional Teaching Practices Commission;

Parole Board;

Board of Nursing;

Real Estate Commission;

Alaska Royalty Oil and Gas Development Advisory Board;

Alaska State Council on the Arts;

Alaska Police Standards Council;

Alaska Commission on Aging;

Alaska Mental Health Board;

State Medical Board;

Governor’s Council on Disabilities and Special Education;

Advisory Board on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse;

Statewide Suicide Prevention Council;

State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors;

Alaska Health Care Commission;

Board of Pharmacy;

Alaska Pioneers’ Home and Alaska Veterans’ Home managers;

hearing examiners in the Department of Revenue;

the comptroller in the division of treasury, Department of Revenue;

airport managers in the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities employed at the Anchorage and Fairbanks International Airports;

the deputy director of the division of insurance in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

the executive director and staff of the Alaska Public Offices Commission;

the rehabilitation administrator of the division of workers’ compensation;

guards employed by the Department of Public Safety for emergencies;

marine pilot coordinator of the Board of Marine Pilots;

guards employed by the Department of Corrections, other than in state correctional facilities, to carry out the responsibility of the commissioner of corrections under AS

33.30.071(b)

;

hearing officers and administrative law judges of the Regulatory Commission of Alaska;

the compact administrator appointed under AS

33.36.130

;

the chief administrative law judge and administrative law judges of the office of administrative hearings;

the executive secretary of the Board of Public Accountancy.

History.

(§ 6 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 48 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 133 SLA 1961; am § 4 ch 5 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 109 SLA 1969; am § 4 ch 78 SLA 1971; am § 9 ch 47 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 82 SLA 1975; am § 10 ch 207 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 157 SLA 1976; am § 19 ch 263 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 39 § 6 (1977); am § 1 ch 103 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 108 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 41 § 3 (1980); am E.O. No. 42 §§ 3, 4 (1980); am E.O. No. 43 § 4 (1980); am E.O. No. 44 § 5 (1980); am E.O. No. 45 § 3 (1980); am E.O. No. 46 § 4 (1980); am § 18 ch 115 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 79 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 110 SLA 1981; am E.O. No. 48 § 3 (1981); am § 4 ch 50 SLA 1982; am § 26 ch 93 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 112 SLA 1982; am 1983 Initiative Proposal No. 2, § 6; am § 106 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 15 ch 55 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 103 SLA 1984; am E.O. No. 58 § 18 (1984); am § 59 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 54 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 84 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 48 SLA 1987; am § 12 ch 98 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 1988; am § 33 ch 141 SLA 1988; am E.O. No. 69 § 22 (1988); am E.O. No. 79 § 2 (1991); am § 13 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 28 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 21 ch 6 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 83 § 20 (1993); am § 18 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am § 3 ch 92 SLA 1995; am § 43 ch 30 SLA 1996; am E.O. No. 94 § 2 (1996); am §§ 4, 24 ch 25 SLA 1999; am §§ 43, 84 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 111 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 2001; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 61 SLA 2002; am § 10 ch 59 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 66 SLA 2004; am § 58 ch 163 SLA 2004; am § 70 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am § 3 ch 96 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 2011; am § 15 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 6, ch. 13, SLA 1992, and AS

01.05.031

, “Governor’s Council on Disabilities and Special Education” was substituted for “Governor’s Council for the Handicapped and Gifted.”

Subsection (c) was reorganized in 1999 and 2002 to reflect the repeals and additions of various paragraphs.

In 2004, in paragraph (c)(12) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For emergency guards, see 13 AAC 62.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 22, 2010, in (c)(7), added (P).

The 2011 amendment, effective August 15, 2011, added (c)(21).

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, added (c)(7)(Q).

Sec. 39.25.130.
Extension of partially exempt and classified services.

The personnel board, upon written recommendation of the commissioner of administration, may extend the partially exempt service to include any position in the classified service that, in the judgment of the board,

involves principal responsibility for the determination of policy;

involves principal responsibility for the way in which policies are carried out; or

involves responsibilities and duties of a type not susceptible to the ordinary recruiting and assessment procedures.

Positions may not be included in the partially exempt service under this section if the inclusion is inconsistent with federal requirements for state agencies supported in whole or in part by federal funds.

The personnel board, upon written recommendation of the commissioner of administration, may extend the classified service to include any position in the partially exempt service.

History.

(§ 7 ch 144 SLA 1960; am §§ 9, 10 ch 112 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 111 SLA 2000)